Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 353 Mineral Conservation And Development

353.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Active mining area” means the area within two hundred (200) feet surrounding current mine works under development, inclusive of the area of five (5) year projections, as indicated on the annually filed mine license map.

“Barrel” or “barrel of oil” means forty-two (42) standard United States liquid measure gallons of two hundred thirty-one (231) cubic inches per gallon, computed at a temperature of sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit.

“Casing” means a string or strings of pipe commonly placed in wells drilled for natural gas and petroleum.

“Cement” means hydraulic cement properly mixed with water only.

“Coal operator” means any person who proposes to or does operate a coal mine.

“Cubic feet of gas” means the volume of gas contained in one (1) cubic foot of space at a standard pressure base of fourteen and seventy-three hundredths (14.73) pounds per square inch and a temperature base of sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit.

“Department” means the Department for Natural Resources.

“Directional survey” means a survey performed while drilling using continuous measuring technology, a survey made through drilling tools, or other surveys at such intervals to accurately determine the location of the deviated wellbore.

“Gas” means natural gas.

“Gas well” means any well which:

Produces natural gas not associated or blended with crude petroleum oil any time during production; or

Produces more than ten thousand (10,000) cubic feet of natural gas to each barrel of crude petroleum oil from the same producing horizon.

“Inclination survey” means a survey performed to measure deviation from the true vertical, irrespective of direction, expressed in degrees.

“NAD 83” means the North American Datum, 1983 version, using feet units.

“Oil” means petroleum.

“Oil well” means any well which produces one (1) barrel or more of oil to each ten thousand (10,000) cubic feet of natural gas.

“Plat” means a map, drawing, or print showing the location of a well.

“Single Zone Projection” means the Kentucky Single Zone State Plane Coordinate System of 1983, based on Lambert Conformal Conic map projection with double standard parallels on the North American Datum, 1983 version, as established in 10 KAR 5:010.

“True vertical” means the orientation of the well at ninety degrees (90) from the horizontal plane at the surface elevation.

“Unit” means any tract or tracts which the department has determined is underlaid by a pool or pools of oil and associated gas, and is not a “drilling unit” as defined in KRS 353.510(19).

“Well” means a borehole drilled or proposed to be drilled for the purpose of producing natural gas or petroleum, or one through which natural gas or petroleum is being produced.

“Well operator” means any person who proposes to or does locate, drill, operate, or abandon any well.

“Workable bed” means:

A coal bed actually being operated commercially;

A coal bed that the department decides can be operated commercially and the operation of which can reasonably be expected to commence within not more than ten (10) years; or

Any coal bed that, from outcrop indication or other definite evidence, proves to the satisfaction of the department to be workable and, when operated, will require protection if wells are drilled through it.

History.

3766b-5; 1994, ch. 431, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 123, § 63, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 79, § 14, effective June 25, 2009.

353.020.
Oil and gas lease or contract, when lessor may avoid.

If a lease or contract of lands for oil and gas purposes provides in substance that actual drilling or development may be postponed by the payment or tender of the rental on or before a certain day, and the rental is not so paid or tendered, the lessor or landowner may avoid the lease or contract unless before executing a new lease or contract he has accepted payment of the rental.

History.

3766b-4.

353.030.
Nonproductive well, when lease or contract satisfied by.

The drilling of one (1) nonproductive well constitutes compliance, for a period of twelve (12) months after its completion, with any lease or contract requirement that a well be drilled within a certain period. At the expiration of such twelve (12) months’ period another well shall be commenced or else rentals shall be renewed according to the terms of the lease or contract, and if the lessee fails to commence a well or pay the rentals the lessor may avoid the lease or contract.

History.

3766b-4b.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section has been worded to comply with Lykins v. Oaks, 286

Ky. 332

, 150 S.W.2d 231 (1941).

353.040.
When offset wells to be drilled.

When oil or gas is discovered in paying quantities on property adjoining a leasehold and the oil or gas from the adjoining property is being taken out of the ground and marketed from one or more wells located on such adjoining property within two hundred (200) feet of the boundary line of the leasehold, and the lessor gives the lessee written notice that oil or gas from such well or wells is being marketed, the lessee shall, within three (3) months after receipt of the notice, begin to drill an offset well to each such well, except that the offset wells need not be less than five hundred (500) feet from each other. If the lessee fails to commence and complete the offset wells with diligence, the lease shall automatically expire and be void. This section does not apply to a lease that is being operated or on which a well is being drilled.

History.

3766b-4c.

353.050.
Plat, showing well, to be filed if well is to extend through coal-bearing strata — Copies to certain persons.

Before a permit may be issued to drill a well on any tract known to be underlaid with coal-bearing strata the well operator shall have a plat prepared showing the exact location of the proposed well utilizing latitudes and longitudes and the Carter coordinate system.

If the location of any well proposed to be drilled, deepened, or reopened is known to be underlaid by a coal-bearing stratum, which is not in operation, owned by a person other than the oil and gas lessor or lessee then, simultaneously with the filing of an application for a permit, the applicant shall send by registered or certified mail a copy of the required plat to the record coal owner or owners, and record coal lessee.

If the coal-bearing stratum is under operation, a copy of the required plat shall also be sent by the applicant by registered or certified mail to each coal operator operating any stratum as designated on the current license issued by the department and at the address stated thereon.

If the address of any record owner is unknown to the applicant and cannot upon diligent inquiry within the county be ascertained, or if there are more than five (5) record owners then, if the applicant shall file with the department an affidavit that either condition exists, the department may prescribe some different method of notifying the record owner in lieu of sending a copy of the plat as required by this section, or may dispense with the requirements of this section.

The plat shall be filed and become a permanent record, subject to inspection at any time by any interested person. Any agent of the coal operator or any superintendent in actual charge of the mine may be considered as a coal operator, and any process agent or other agent or person in charge of the coal for him may be considered the owner, for the purposes of mailing the required copy of the plat.

History.

3766b-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 315, § 77; 1992, ch. 348, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

353.060.
Petition to object to location of well — Notice — Hearing — Drilling permit.

If the drilling of a well on any tract underlaid with coal-bearing strata will endanger the present or future use or operation of a workable coal bed, the owner or coal operator affected may, within fifteen (15) days from the receipt of the plat by him and by the department, file with the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings a petition in accordance with KRS

353.700

and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, listing the specific objections in writing to the proposed location. The Energy and Environment Cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings shall provide notice of receipt of the petition to the well operator and the department, and shall schedule a hearing, at which the objections shall be considered.

At the hearing, the well operator and the coal operator or owner, in person or by a representative, shall consider the objections and either agree upon the location as proposed or change it so as to satisfy all objections and meet the approval of the department.

Any new location thus selected and agreed upon shall be indicated on a plat in accordance with KRS

353.050

and thereupon the department shall issue to the well operator a drilling permit approving the location and authorizing the well operator to drill at the location.

If the coal operator and well operator, or the owner and well operator, are unable to agree, the hearing officer shall make a recommendation to the secretary, in view of the purposes and intent of this chapter and in compliance therewith, to fix a location on the tract as near the proposed location as possible and upon final order of the secretary, the department shall issue to the well operator a permit to drill at the new location.

If no objections are filed within the fifteen (15) day period, the department shall immediately issue to the well operator a drilling permit approving the location and authorizing the well operator to proceed to drill there.

History.

3766b-7: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 348, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 338, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 94, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). Under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has altered the format of the text in this statute during codification. The words in the text were not changed.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is clear that the legislature intended that the application be held without issuing a permit until the expiration of the five-day period to give the owner, operator or lessee of the coal-bearing stratum an opportunity to raise his objection before the drilling begins.

OAG 65-118

.

There is necessarily implied authority in the statutes for the Department of Mines and Minerals to make objection on its own motion to a well location in applying its expertise for the safety of persons. However, the department, when acting pursuant to this section, must follow the time limitations therein provided both as to the five days for filing objection and as to the ten days for holding a hearing thereafter. Further, so long as the department, upon reasonable information and in good faith, takes the action provided for in this section, observing the time limitations, its officers could not be held liable for such action in a civil suit for damages. In the absence of such circumstances, the law makes the issuance of the permit mandatory.

OAG 65-118

.

While the presence of active mine workings under the location or in proximity to it might increase the dangers to be encountered in drilling over coal-bearing strata, it does not affect the five-day waiting period required by this section which is mandatory in either event.

OAG 65-118

.

353.070.
Index of plats — Agreement permitting well operator to select location.

The department shall keep a proper index of the plats and locations, and shall keep an accurate record of the proceedings in case of any conference or dispute. Where the well operator is working under any agreement with or from the owner or the coal operator operating the workable coal beds under the tract, and the agreement permits the well operator to select his own locations, the location as originally chosen by the well operator shall become the authorized location and the department shall issue the proper permit for the drilling of the well.

History.

3766b-7.

353.080.
Drilling through coal bed.

A well penetrating one (1) or more workable coal beds shall be drilled in such manner as will, if practicable, exclude all oil, gas or gas pressure from the coal bed, except such as is found in the coal bed itself. Each string of casing that is run through a workable coal bed shall be seated at least thirty (30) feet below the coal bed in twenty (20) feet of cement, mud, clay or other nonporous material that will make an effective seal. If a second workable coal bed is found less than thirty (30) feet below the first workable coal bed, the casing shall be seated and mudded off as above provided at least thirty (30) feet below the second bed. If gas is found between the two (2) beds, it shall be treated as prescribed by KRS

353.090

. After any such string of casing has been properly seated, drilling may proceed immediately.

When a well is drilled through the horizon of a coal bed where the coal has been removed, the hole shall be drilled at least thirty (30) feet below the coal bed, and shall be of a size sufficient to permit the placing of a liner, which shall start not less than twenty (20) feet beneath the horizon of the coal bed and extend not less than twenty (20) feet above it. Within this liner, which may be welded to the casing to be used, shall be centrally placed the largest size casing to be used in the well, and the space between the liner and the casing shall be filled with cement as the liner and casing are lowered into the hole. Cement shall be placed in the bottom of the hole to a depth of twenty (20) feet to form a sealed seat for both liner and casing. Following the setting of the liner, drilling may proceed. If it is necessary to drill through the horizon of two (2) or more coal beds where the coal has been removed, the liner shall be started not less than twenty (20) feet below the lowest horizon penetrated and shall extend to a point not less than twenty (20) feet above the highest horizon penetrated.

History.

3766b-8, 3766b-11.

353.090.
Gas found beneath or between coal beds.

If gas is found beneath a workable coal bed before the hole has been reduced from the size it had at the coal bed, a packer shall be placed below the coal bed and above the gas horizon, and the gas by this means diverted to the inside of the adjacent string of casing through perforations made in the string of casing, and through it passed to the surface without contact with the coal bed. If gas is found between two (2) workable beds of coal, in a hole of the same diameter from bed to bed, two (2) packers shall be placed with perforations in the casing between them, permitting the gas to pass inside the adjacent casing to the surface. The strings of casing shall in either case extend from their seats to the top of the well.

History.

3766b-9.

353.100.
Casings to remain in place during life of productive well.

If any well becomes productive of oil or gas, all coal protecting strings of casing shall remain in place during the life of the well, and the top ends of all the strings shall be provided with casing heads or other suitable devices that will permit the free passage of gas and prevent filling the annular spaces outside the casing with dirt or debris.

History.

3766b-10.

353.110.
Abandonment of well drilled through coal strata — Plugging of well.

Prior to the abandonment of a well drilled through a workable coal bed the well operator shall notify, by certified mail, return receipt requested or by registered mail, the operator or owner of the coal bed and the department of the intention to plug and abandon the well. The notice shall give the number of the well and its location, and fix the time at which the work of plugging and filling will be commenced, the time not to be less than five (5) days after the day on which the notice is received, or in due course should be received, by the department. The department shall prescribe the form of notice to be used. A representative or representatives of the coal operator or owner and of the department may be present at the plugging and filling of the well. Whether or not such representatives appear, the well operator may proceed, at the time fixed, to plug and fill the well. When the plugging and filling have been completed, an affidavit setting forth the time and manner in which the well was plugged shall be made in triplicate by two (2) experienced men who participated in the work. The affidavit shall be made on forms furnished by the department. One (1) copy of the affidavit shall be retained by the well operator, one (1) mailed to each coal operator and each owner, and one (1) to the department.

History.

3766b-12: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 315, § 78.

353.120.
Method of plugging well drilled through coal-bearing strata.

When any well drilled through a workable coal bed is abandoned, it shall at that time be plugged to a point forty (40) feet below the lowest workable coal bed, in the following manner: The hole shall be filled with mud, clay or other nonporous material from the bottom to a point twenty (20) feet above the top of the lowest oil, gas or water-bearing strata, or a permanent bridge shall be anchored thirty (30) feet below its lowest oil, gas or water-bearing strata, and from this bridge it shall be filled with mud, clay or other nonporous material to a point twenty (20) feet above the strata, at which point there shall be placed a plug of cement or other suitable material that will completely seal the hole. Between this sealing plug and a point twenty (20) feet above the next higher oil, gas or water-bearing strata, the hole shall be treated in a like manner and at that point there shall be placed another suitable plug, that will completely seal the hole. In a like manner the hole shall be filled and plugged, or bridged, filled and plugged, with reference to each of its oil, gas or water-bearing strata. Whenever such strata are not widely separated and are free from water, they may be grouped and treated as a single productive stratum. After plugging all strata, a final plug shall be anchored approximately ten (10) feet below the bottom of the largest casing in the well and from that point to the surface the well shall be filled with mud, clay or other nonporous material.

History.

3766b-13.

353.130.
Alternative methods that may be used when strata shot.

If any of the strata in the well have been shot, creating cavities that cannot readily be filled in the manner described in KRS

353.120

, the well operator shall follow either of the following methods:

If the stratum that has been shot is the lowest one in the well, there shall be placed, at the nearest suitable point but not less than twenty (20) feet above the stratum, a plug of cement or other suitable material that will completely seal the hole; but if the shooting has been done above one (1) or more oil or gas-bearing strata in the well, plugging in the manner specified shall be done at the nearest suitable point, but not less than twenty (20) feet below and above the stratum shot.

When the cavity is in the lowest oil or gas-bearing stratum in the well, a liner shall be placed which shall extend from below the stratum to a suitable point, but not less than twenty (20) feet above the stratum in which the shooting has been done; but if the shooting has been done above one (1) or more oil or gas-bearing strata in the well, the liner shall be so placed that it will extend not less than twenty (20) feet above or less than twenty (20) feet below the stratum in which shooting has been done. After the liner is placed, it shall be compactly filled with cement, clay or other nonporous sealing material.

History.

3766b-13.

353.140.
Gas escape pipe, when to be used.

When a well has been filled and securely plugged to a point forty (40) feet below the lowest workable coal bed, and in the judgment of the well operator, the coal operator and the department a permanent outlet to the surface is required, the outlet shall be provided in the following manner: A plug of cement or other suitable material shall be placed in the well at a suitable point, not less than ten (10) feet below the lowest workable coal bed. In this plug and passing through the center of it shall be securely fastened an open pipe, not less than two (2) inches in diameter, which shall extend to the surface. At or above the surface the pipe shall be provided with a device that will permit the free passage of gas and prevent obstruction. After the plug and pipe are set, the hole shall be filled with cement to a point ten (10) feet above the lowest workable coal bed. If there are additional overlying workable coal beds, they shall be treated similarly, if in the judgment of the well operator, the coal operator and the department such treatment is necessary. If the parties cannot agree, the decision of the department shall control.

History.

3766b-13.

353.150.
Unused oil, gas or salt water well to be closed to prevent waste.

Any person in possession as owner, lessee, agent or manager of any well in which oil, gas or salt water has been found shall, unless the product is utilized, close the well within a reasonable time not exceeding three (3) months from the completion of the well, in order to prevent the product from wasting by escape, and keep the well closed until the product is utilized. This subsection does not apply to gas escaping from any well while it is being operated as an oil well, or while it is used for fresh or mineral water.

If a person fails to comply with subsection (1), any person lawfully in possession of land adjacent to or in the neighborhood of the well may enter upon the land on which the well is located and tube and pack it, and shut in the oil, gas or salt water. Any person so closing the well may maintain a civil action against the owner, lessee, agent or manager, jointly and severally, to recover the cost.

History.

3910, 3913.

353.160.
Gas waste to be prevented — Presumption of negligence.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, natural gas shall not be permitted to waste or escape from any well or pipeline, when it is reasonably possible to prevent such waste, after the owner or operator of the gas, or of the well or pipeline, has had a reasonable time to shut the gas in the well, or to make the necessary repairs to the well or pipeline to prevent such waste.

If, in the process of drilling a well for oil or gas, or both, gas is found in the well, and the owner or operator desires to continue to search for oil or gas, or both, by drilling deeper in search of lower oil or gas-bearing strata, or if it becomes necessary to make repairs to any well producing gas, commonly known as “cleaning out,” and if in either event it is necessary for the gas in the well to escape during the process of drilling or making repairs, the owner or operator of the well shall prosecute the drilling or repairs with reasonable diligence so that the waste of gas from the well shall not continue longer than reasonably necessary and if, during the progress of such drilling or repairs, any temporary suspension becomes necessary, the owner or operator shall use all reasonable means to shut in the gas and prevent its waste.

Where both oil and gas are found and produced from the same stratum and it is necessary for the gas therefrom to waste in the process of producing the oil, the owner or operator shall use all reasonable diligence to conserve and save from waste so much of the gas as it is reasonably possible to save.

In all cases of waste under this section it may be presumed that the waste was due to the negligence of the operator.

History.

3766b-21.

353.170.
Putting pressure on strata — Wells may remain open if conforming to Federal Safe Drinking Water Act.

The owner or operator of any well that produces oil or gas may allow the well to remain open for the purpose of introducing air, gas, water, or other liquid pressure into and upon the producing strata for the purpose of recovering the oil, if the introduction of air, gas, water, or other liquid conforms to the requirements of Section 1425 of the Safe Drinking Water Act (Public Law 93-523 as amended) and any regulations associated with it.

History.

3766b-20a: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 348, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

353.180.
Requirements for plugging abandoned well — Bids — Remedy for possessor of adjacent land or for department.

No person shall abandon or remove casings from any oil or gas well, either dry or producing, without first plugging the well in a secure manner approved by the department and consistent with its administrative regulations. Upon the department’s plugging of an abandoned well in accordance with the requirements of this subsection, the department may sell, by sealed bid, or include as part of compensation in the contract for the plugging of the well, all equipment removed from that well and deposit the proceeds of the sale into the oil and gas well plugging fund, established in KRS 353.590(27).

Not less than thirty (30) days before advertising for bids for the plugging of wells, the department shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation, and in locally published newspapers serving the areas in which the wells proposed for plugging are located, notices of all wells on which there is salvageable equipment, described as to farm name and Carter Coordinate location, for which the department intends to seek bids for plugging. If a person other than the operator claims an interest in the equipment of a well proposed for plugging, he shall provide documentation of that interest to the department within thirty (30) days of the date of publication of the notice of the department’s intent to plug a well. Prior to the department’s advertising of bids for the plugging of a well, the department shall release the well’s equipment to the person deemed to have an interest in that equipment and it shall be the duty of the interest holder to remove the equipment before the well is plugged. If documentation as to an asserted interest is not provided to the department in the manner described in this subsection or a person deemed to be an interest holder fails to remove the equipment before a well is plugged, the department may sell or otherwise dispose of the equipment in accordance with this subsection.

If a person fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section, any person lawfully in possession of land adjacent to the well or the department may enter on the land upon which the well is located and plug the well in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, and may maintain a civil action against the owner or person abandoning the well, jointly or severally, to recover the cost of plugging the well. This subsection shall not apply to persons owning the land on which the well is situated, and drilled by other persons.

HISTORY:

3914, 3914a: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 348, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 277, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 21, § 11, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 21, § 10, effective June 27, 2019.

353.190.
Salt and saltpetre works to be inclosed — Liability.

The owner or occupant of any salt works and saltpetre works shall keep those works, and the grounds upon which the brine, bitter water or saltpetre water is drained or deposited inclosed, so as to prevent the stock of other persons from having access thereto.

When a well or pit sunk for salt water, or in connection with a salt works or saltpetre works, is abandoned or not used, it shall be filled up, or inclosed as provided in subsection (1), by the owner or occupant of the grounds or the persons who sank the well or pit.

If subsections (1) and (2) are not complied with, and the stock of another is injured by gaining access to the well or pit, the persons under the duty to comply with those subsections shall be jointly and severally liable for the damages sustained by the injury to or destruction of the stock.

History.

4358, 4359.

353.200.
Department for Natural Resources to enforce oil and gas law — Complaints — Hearings — Final order of secretary.

The department shall exercise supervision over the drilling, casing, plugging, and filling of all wells. The department shall exercise supervision over all mining operations in close proximity to any well. The department shall have access to the records and properties of coal and oil and gas operators when necessary.

The department may receive, or may file on its own motion, formal complaints with the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings that drilling or mining operations are being conducted contrary to the provisions of KRS

353.010

,

353.050

to

353.130

,

352.510

, or

353.592

, or to an order of the department. Following a hearing, the secretary shall issue a final order necessary to secure the proper administration of KRS

353.010

,

353.050

to

353.130

,

352.510

, or

353.592

.

HISTORY:

3766b-15: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 348, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 339, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 94, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

353.205.
Department to release production data on crude oil and natural gas.

The Department of Revenue shall submit to the department on or before September 1 of each year, beginning in 1995 for 1994 production data, statistics on crude oil as reported to the Department of Revenue under the crude oil excise tax requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics on natural gas production as reported to the Department of Revenue under the natural resources severance tax requirements of KRS Chapter 143A.

The department shall organize the information it receives from the Department of Revenue into a standard format, and shall make it available for public release no earlier than January 1 nor later than March 1 of the following year, with the exception of the first year, when data shall be made available by September 1, 1996. The information shall be open for public inspection and available for sale at the offices of the department. The department may allow the Kentucky Geological Survey to use the production information in ongoing research as soon as it is obtained from the Department of Revenue, so long as the information is not released to the public before January 1 of the year after it is reported.

The Department of Revenue shall submit to the department the oil and gas production data which was reported in years prior to 1995, and the department shall make this information available for public release when it has been processed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, § 686, effective June 20, 2005.

353.210.
Agreement consolidating oil and gas leases may be executed by trustee representing contingent future interests.

A trustee appointed by any Circuit Court of this state in cases where contingent future interests in land are involved may enter into a consolidation agreement, as defined in KRS

353.220

, subject to approval by the Circuit Judge as provided in KRS

353.230

. The detailed provisions of such agreement may be such as the court approves, consistently with the provisions of KRS

353.220

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 71, § 1.

353.220.
Nature of agreement.

A consolidation agreement, within the provisions of KRS

353.210

to

353.230

, is an agreement which provides for the consolidation of an oil and gas lease, or some portion thereof, with some other oil and gas lease or leases, or portions thereof, so that the oil and gas leases or portions thereof embraced in such agreement shall be operated and developed for oil and gas purposes as one (1) unit lease, and all royalties which may accrue from production on such consolidated area shall be treated as an entirety and shall be divided among and paid to the owners (or their lawful representatives) of the royalties in such area upon an acreage basis, so that each shall receive a share of such royalties calculated upon the basis of the ratio between each owner’s interest in royalty and the entire interest in the royalties embraced in the consolidated area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 71, § 2.

353.230.
Petition for court approval — Affidavits — Guardian ad litem — Order of approval.

Upon the execution of such a consolidation agreement, the trustee shall file with the clerk of the Circuit Court in the county in which the land covered by the lease to be consolidated hereunder, or the greater portion thereof, lies a petition for an order approving such consolidation agreement setting forth a copy of the consolidation agreement and a statement of facts constituting the grounds relied upon to secure the approval of such agreement, and shall submit with the petition the affidavits of not less than three (3) disinterested owners of real estate in the county wherein the proceedings hereunder are brought, as to whether such agreement will be advantageous or beneficial to the beneficiaries for whom such trustee is acting, which affidavits shall be filed and preserved as records of the Circuit Court.

No agreement permitted by KRS

353.210

to

353.230

shall be valid or effective until the judge of said court appoints a guardian ad litem to represent the beneficiaries for whom such trustee is acting and whose interests are sought to be consolidated hereunder. The guardian ad litem shall file an answer and the affidavits of at least three (3) witnesses, proving the advantages or disadvantages of such agreement, and shall make such recommendation to the judge relating to the agreement as he believes to be most beneficial to the persons on whose behalf he is acting. He shall receive for his services a reasonable compensation, to be allowed by the judge and taxed as costs.

The judge shall proceed in a summary manner to approve or disapprove the consolidation agreement, and if he approves it he shall endorse his approval thereon. The order of the judge approving such agreement shall be entered on the civil order book of the circuit clerk’s office of the county in which the proceedings hereunder are brought.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 71, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 282, effective January 2, 1978.

353.240.
Agreement consolidating oil and gas leases may be executed by guardian.

A guardian of a minor may enter into a consolidation agreement, as defined in KRS

353.250

, subject to approval by the Circuit Judge as provided in KRS

353.260

. The detailed provisions of such agreement may be such as the court approves, consistently with the provisions of KRS

353.250

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 72, § 1.

353.250.
Nature of agreement.

A consolidation agreement, within the provisions of KRS

353.240

to

353.260

, is an agreement which provides for the consolidation of an oil and gas lease, or some portion thereof, with some other oil and gas lease or leases, or portions thereof, so that the oil and gas leases or portions thereof embraced in such agreement shall be operated and developed for oil and gas purposes as one (1) unit lease, and all royalties which may accrue from production on such consolidated area shall be treated as an entirety and shall be divided among and paid to the owners (or their lawful representatives) of the royalties in such area upon an acreage basis, so that each shall receive a share of such royalties calculated upon the basis of the ratio between each owner’s interest in royalty and the entire interest in the royalties embraced in the consolidated area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 72, § 2.

353.260.
Petition for court approval — Affidavits — Guardian ad litem — Order of approval.

Upon the execution of such a consolidation agreement, the guardian shall file with the clerk of the Circuit Court in the county in which the land covered by the lease to be consolidated hereunder, or the greater portion thereof, lies a petition for an order approving such consolidation agreement setting forth a copy of the consolidation agreement and a statement of facts constituting the grounds relied upon to secure the approval of such agreement, and shall submit with the petition the affidavits of not less than three (3) disinterested owners of real estate in the county wherein the proceedings hereunder are brought, as to whether such agreement will be advantageous or beneficial to the minor or minors for whom such guardian is acting, which affidavits shall be filed and preserved as records of the Circuit Court.

No agreement permitted by KRS

353.240

to

353.260

shall be valid or effective until the judge of said court appoints a guardian ad litem to represent the minor or minors whose interests are sought to be consolidated hereunder. The guardian ad litem shall file an answer and the affidavits of at least three (3) witnesses, proving the advantages or disadvantages of such agreement, and shall make such recommendation to the judge relating to the agreement as he believes to be most beneficial to the persons on whose behalf he is acting. He shall receive for his services a reasonable compensation, to be allowed by the judge and taxed as costs.

The judge shall proceed in a summary manner to approve or disapprove the consolidation agreement, and if he approves it he shall endorse his approval thereon. The order of the judge approving such agreement shall be entered on the civil order book of the circuit clerk’s office of the county in which the proceedings hereunder are brought.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 72, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 283, effective January 2, 1978.

353.270.
Agreement consolidating oil and gas leases may be executed by guardian or conservator. [Repealed.]

353.280.
Nature of agreement. [Repealed.]

353.290.
Petition for court approval — Affidavits — Guardian ad litem — Order of approval. [Repealed.]

353.300.
Appointment of trustee to execute mineral lease where contingent future interests are involved.

Where lands, or any estate or interest therein, are subject to any contingent future interest, legal or equitable, by way of remainder, reversion, or possibility of reverter, upon the happening of a condition subsequent, or otherwise, created by deed, will, or otherwise, and whether a trust is involved or not, and it is made to appear that it will be advantageous to the present and ultimate owners of said lands or estate or interest therein, the court shall have the power, pending the happening of any contingency and the vesting of such future interest or interests, to declare a trust in said lands or estate or interest therein, appoint a trustee therefor, and to authorize such trustee to sell, execute and deliver a valid oil, gas, coal or other mineral lease covering said lands or estate or interest therein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 1.

353.310.
Jurisdiction of court.

The Circuit Court of the county wherein the land sought to be leased, or some portion thereof, is situated shall have jurisdiction of the proceedings authorized under KRS

353.300

to

353.380

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 2.

353.320.
Who may institute proceedings.

The proceedings provided for by KRS

353.300

to

353.380

may be instituted upon the petition of any one (1) or more of the parties who have a present interest or a contingent interest in the land or estate or interest therein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 3.